Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5820YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2213 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 331.310 Mineral rights. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âInterest in mineralsâ means a perpetual interest in real 3 estate that grants ownership of one or more minerals underlying 4 the real estate to a person other than the person who owns 5 the surface rights in and to the real estate. âInterest in 6 mineralsâ does not include a lease of real estate that allows 7 the tenant to remove minerals from the real estate. 8 b. âMineralsâ means coal, gas, oil, or other gaseous, 9 liquid, or solid hydrocarbons; oil shale; gemstones; 10 fissionable or nonfissionable ore; and steam or other 11 geothermal resources. 12 2. A county shall divest itself of any interest in minerals 13 owned or controlled by the county and shall convey such 14 interest in minerals to the surface owner of the land to 15 which the interest in minerals pertains. A conveyance under 16 this section shall be made without consideration and shall be 17 without cost to the surface owner of the land. 18 3. A county shall complete all conveyances required under 19 this section no later than five years after the effective date 20 of this Act. 21 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 364.26 Mineral rights. 22 1. For purposes of this section: 23 a. âInterest in mineralsâ means a perpetual interest in real 24 estate that grants ownership of one or more minerals underlying 25 the real estate to a person other than the person who owns 26 the surface rights in and to the real estate. âInterest in 27 mineralsâ does not include a lease of real estate that allows 28 the tenant to remove minerals from the real estate. 29 b. âMineralsâ means coal, gas, oil, or other gaseous, 30 liquid, or solid hydrocarbons; oil shale; gemstones; 31 fissionable or nonfissionable ore; and steam or other 32 geothermal resources. 33 2. A city shall divest itself of any interest in minerals 34 owned or controlled by the county and shall convey such 35 -1- LSB 5820YH (2) 91 ms/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2213 interest in minerals to the surface owner of the land to 1 which the interest in minerals pertains. A conveyance under 2 this section shall be made without consideration and shall be 3 without cost to the surface owner of the land. 4 3. A city shall complete all conveyances required under this 5 section no later than five years after the effective date of 6 this Act. 7